Louisiana, session 2026, SB24.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Interstate
49 in its entirety in the state of Louisiana beginning where Interstate 49 intersects with
Interstate 10 in Lafayette Parish, extending north through the state of Louisiana, is
hereby designated as "Senator J. Bennett Johnston Jr. Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of this designation provided local or
private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs
for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to exceed
the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 24 ENROLLED
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall not cause any other state highway
designation along Interstate 49 to be repealed or replaced. The department shall not
remove any state highway designations currently provided for in law along Interstate
49 due to any provision within this Act and unless specific legislation succeeding this
Act is enacted to require the removal.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.